Colorado statutes. TITLE 41 Aeronautics: Aircraft and Airports
PART 1
COUNTY AIRPORTS

41-4-101. Operation a governmental function.

The acquisition of any lands for the purpose of establishing airports or other air navigation facilities; the acquisition of airport protection privileges; the acquisition, establishment, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipment, and operation of airports and other air navigation facilities; and the exercise of any other powers granted in this part 1 to any county, city and county, city, or town are hereby declared to be public governmental functions, exercised for a public purpose, and matters of public necessity; and such lands and other property, easements, and privileges acquired and used in the manner and for the purposes enumerated in this part 1 are hereby declared to be acquired and used for public purposes and as a matter of public necessity.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 38, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45, § 242.

CRS 53:

§ 5-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-4-1.

41-4-102. Authority to establish.

The board of county commissioners in any county in this state either singly or jointly with any other county, city and county, city, or town has the power to acquire, establish, construct, own, control, lease, equip, improve, maintain, operate, and regulate airports and landing fields for the use of airplanes and other aircraft and to contract or otherwise provide, by condemnation if necessary, for the removal of any airport hazard, or the removal or the relocation of all private structures, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, wires, cables, poles, and all other facilities and equipment which may interfere with the location, expansion, development, or improvement of such airports, restricted landing areas, and other air navigation facilities or with the safe approach thereto or takeoff therefrom by aircraft, and to pay the cost of removal or relocation.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 38, § 2.

CSA:

C. 45, § 243.

CRS 53:

§ 5-4-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-4-2.

Cross references:

For other authority to establish airports, see § 30-11-107 (1)(j).

41-4-103. Joint action by corporate authority.

All of the powers, rights, and authority granted to counties by this part 1 and to cities and towns by any other law may be exercised and enjoyed by such counties, cities and counties, cities, and towns, acting jointly, either within or without the territorial limits thereof, without regard to the distance said airport may be located from the boundary of any such city or town.

Any two or more of such counties, cities and counties, cities, or towns may enter into agreements with each other duly authorized by resolution or ordinance for joint action pursuant to the provisions of this part 1. Each such agreement shall specify the proportionate interest which each county, city and county, city, or town has in the property, facilities, and privileges involved and the proportion of costs of acquisition, establishment, construction, enlargement, improvement, equipment, and expenses of maintenance, operation, and regulation to be borne by each, and it shall make such other provisions as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this part 1 for the amendment thereof and the conditions and terms upon which such agreement may be terminated.

A county or two or more of such counties, cities and counties, cities, or towns that entered into an agreement under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) may enter into an agreement under section 29-1-203, C.R.S., with a county or municipality of an adjoining state to jointly operate an airport in this state created pursuant to this part 1. The agreement must include the same information for an agreement described in said paragraph (a).

Source:

L. 45:

p. 39, § 3.

CSA:

C. 45, § 244.

CRS 53:

§ 5-4-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-4-3.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (SB 16-168), ch. 164, p. 525, § 5, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For authority of local governments to contract with each other, see § 29-1-203.

41-4-104. Acquisition.

Real property needed by any county, either acting singly or jointly, shall be acquired by purchase or by condemnation in the manner provided by law for acquiring real property for public purposes. The political subdivision exercising such power in addition to the damage for the taking, injury, or destruction of property shall also pay the cost of the removal and relocation of any structures, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, wires, cables, or poles of any public utility which is required to be moved to a new location.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 39, § 4.

CSA:

C. 45, § 245.

CRS 53:

§ 5-4-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-4-4.

Cross references:

For condemnation proceedings, see articles 1 to 7 of title 38.

41-4-105. Authority to incur indebtedness.

The board of county commissioners of any county, either acting singly or jointly with any other county, city and county, city, or town, has the power to incur indebtedness on its behalf for any of the purposes mentioned in this part 1 and to issue bonds for the acquisition, construction, and improvement of airports, landing fields, air navigation facilities, and airport protection privileges in the same form and manner as debt is incurred and bonds issued for other county purposes; except that such indebtedness may also be approved at a special election called for that purpose by the board of county commissioners, which election shall be conducted insofar as practicable in the manner set forth in section 30-26-101, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 39, § 5.

CSA:

C. 45, § 246.

CRS 53:

§ 5-4-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-4-5.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 789, § 1, effective February 24.

Cross references:

For the constitutional provision that establishes limitations on the incurring of debt, see § 20 of article X, Colorado Constitution; for authority of local governments to contract debts, see § 6 of article XI, Colorado Constitution; for creation of a debt by a county for acquiring or building airports and landing strips, see § 30-26-301.

41-4-106. Operation of airports.

In connection with the erection, maintenance, and operation of any such airport or navigation facilities, any county has the power and jurisdiction, when acting singly, or by agreement, when acting jointly with any other county, city and county, city, or town, to regulate the receipt, deposit, and removal and the embarkation of passengers or property to or from such airports; to exact and require charges, fees, and tolls, together with a lien to enforce their payment; to lease or assign for operation such space or area, appurtenances, appliances, or other conveniences necessary or useful in connection therewith; to own and operate aircraft; to employ pilots; to provide rules and regulations governing the use of such airport and facilities and the use of other property and means of transportation within or over said airport, landing field, and navigation facilities; to perform any duties necessary or consistent for the regulation of air traffic; to enter into contracts or otherwise cooperate with the federal government or other public or private agencies; and to exercise such powers as may be required or consistent in the promotion of aeronautics and the furtherance of commerce and navigation by air.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 40, § 6.

CSA:

C. 45, § 247.

CRS 53:

§ 5-4-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-4-6.

41-4-107. Appropriation for airports.

The board of county commissioners of any county is hereby authorized to annually appropriate from the county general fund the sum sufficient to carry out the provisions of this part 1 relating to airports.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 40, § 7.

CSA:

C. 45, § 248.

L. 51:

p. 296, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 5-4-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-4-7.

41-4-108. Removal of airport hazards.

Where necessary, in order to provide unobstructed airspace for the landing and taking off of aircraft utilizing airports or landing fields acquired or operated under the provisions of this part 1, any such county, city and county, city, or town, either singly or jointly, is authorized to contract or otherwise provide, by condemnation if necessary, for the removal of any airport hazard or the removal or the relocation of all private structures, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, wires, cables, poles, and other facilities and equipment which may interfere with the location, expansion, development, or improvement of such airports, restricted landing areas, and other air navigation facilities or with the safe approach thereto or takeoff therefrom by aircraft and to pay the cost of removal or relocation. A county, city and county, city, or town may acquire, in the same manner as is provided for the acquisition of property for airport purposes, easements through or other interests in airspaces over land or water, interests in airport hazards outside the boundaries of the airports or landing fields, and such other airport protection privileges as are necessary to ensure safe approaches to the landing areas of said airports or landing fields and the safe and efficient operation thereof. It is also hereby authorized to acquire, in the same manner, the right or easement, for a term of years or perpetually, to place or maintain suitable marks for the daytime markings and suitable lights for the nighttime markings of airport hazards, and including the right of ingress and egress to or from such airport hazards, for the purpose of maintaining and repairing such lights and marks. This authority shall not be so construed as to limit any right, power, or authority to zone property adjacent to airports and landing fields, under the provisions of any law of this state.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 40, § 8(a).

CSA:

C. 45, § 249.

CRS 53:

§ 5-4-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-4-8.

41-4-109. Encroachment a nuisance.

It is unlawful for anyone to build, rebuild, create, or cause to be built, rebuilt, or created any object or plant or cause to be planted or permit to grow higher any tree or other vegetation which shall encroach upon any airport protection privileges acquired pursuant to the provisions of section 41-4-108, but it is lawful to make maintenance repairs to or to replace parts of existing structures which do not enlarge or increase the height of an existing structure. Any such encroachment is declared to be a public nuisance and may be abated in the manner prescribed by law for the abatement of public nuisances; or the county, city and county, city, or town or the board in charge of the airport or landing field for which airport protection privileges have been acquired may go upon the land of others and remove any such encroachment without being liable for damages.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 41, § 8(b).

CSA:

C. 45, § 250.

CRS 53:

§ 5-4-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-4-9.

41-4-110. Previous acts legalized.

Any acquisition of property made prior to April 3, 1945, by any county for the purposes specified in this part 1 and any bonds issued before said date by any such county for such purposes or any election held before said date by such county for the purpose of authorizing the issuance of bonds for any of the provisions specified in this part 1 are hereby legalized and made valid and effective.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 41, § 9.

CSA:

C. 45, § 251.

CRS 53:

§ 5-4-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-4-10.

41-4-111. Federal aid.

Any county, city and county, city, or town is authorized to accept, receive, and receipt for federal moneys for the acquisition, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipment, or operation of airports, landing fields, air navigation facilities, or airport protection privileges under such terms and conditions as may be agreed to by such county, city and county, city, or town.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 41, § 10.

CSA:

C. 45, § 252.

CRS 53:

§ 5-4-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-4-11.

41-4-112. Additional powers.

The board of county commissioners of any county is authorized to rent or lease or lease and convey any lands or interest in lands acquired by the county for the purposes set forth in this part 1 to any person, partnership, association, or corporation, either public or private, for commercial, industrial, or other purposes, for such periods of years and upon such terms and conditions as are deemed in the best interests of the county by the board of county commissioners, and the terms thereof shall be binding upon succeeding boards of county commissioners. Any such instruments made and entered into before March 25, 1963, by the board of county commissioners of any county are hereby confirmed, validated, and declared to be legal and valid insofar as the authority of such board is concerned.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 154, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 5-4-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-4-12.

41-4-113. County airport fund.

A fund to be known as the county airport fund is hereby created and established in each of the counties of the state of Colorado, to which shall be credited all moneys received from state and federal sources, and appropriations thereto by the board of county commissioners, and any levies imposed by the board of county commissioners for the construction or maintenance of airports.

The board of county commissioners shall appropriate from said fund for construction, maintenance, and operation of either a county airport or a municipal airport in the manner which in its judgment shall best serve the public interest.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 152, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-4-13.

L. 88:

(1) amended, p. 1094, § 13, effective January 1, 1989.